Utah statutes.
73-26-104.   Bear River development projects.
(1)  The division shall:
(a)  develop the surface waters of the Bear River and its tributaries through
the planning and construction of reservoirs and associated facilities as
authorized and funded by the Legislature;
(b)  own and operate the facilities constructed; and
(c)  market the developed waters.
(2)  Potential projects include:
(a)  Hyrum Dam;
(b)  Avon;
(c)  Mill Creek;
(d)  Oneida Narrows;
(e)  North Eden Creek;
(f)  Washakie; and
(g)  an interconnection from the Corinne area to Willard Reservoir.
(3)  The division may develop sites other than those listed in Subsection (2)
if those projects are authorized and funded by the Legislature.
(4)  The purchase of real property does not constitute water development.
